Alabama, session 2026rs, SB162.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. For the fiscal year ending September 30,
2027, there is hereby appropriated to the Coalition Against
Domestic Violence from the State General Fund the sum of
$169,633. In addition, the appropriation made herein shall be
budgeted and allotted pursuant to the Budget Management Act
and Article 4 of Title 41 of the Code of Alabama, 1975, and
specifically Section 41-4-93, Section 41-4-95 and Section
41-4-96.
Section 2. Prior to the release of any funds
appropriated under this bill for fiscal year 2027, an
operations plan for fiscal year 2027 and an audited financial
statement for all operations during fiscal year 2025 must be
forwarded to the Director of Finance. It is the intent to
release fiscal year 2027 funds following receipt of these
reports.
Section 3. In addition, quarterly reports for fiscal
year 2027 shall be made to the Director of Finance relating to
planned expenditures and accomplishments. An end of year
Page 1

planned expenditures and accomplishments. An end of year
SB162 Enrolled
performance report for the fiscal year 2027 shall be made to
the Director of Finance stating the work accomplished and
services provided and the costs of accomplishing the work and
providing the services, citing meaningful measures of program
effectiveness and costs, as is required for state agencies in
Code of Alabama 1975, Section 41-19-11. The Director of
Finance shall forward a copy of all required reports to the
Legislative Council in a timely manner.
Section 4. This act shall become effective October 1,
2026.
Page 2

2026.
SB162 Enrolled






________________________________________________
President and Presiding Officer of the Senate



________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Representatives


SB162
Senate 11-Mar-26
I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and passed
the Senate.

Patrick Harris,
Secretary.




House of Representatives
Passed: 01-Apr-26




By: Senator Albritton
Page 3